Florida, session 2026, HB1219.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 258.603, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
258.603 Andrew "Red" Harris Spoil Island designated.—
(1) SI3, a mangrove island adjacent to the Intracoastal
Waterway within Jupiter Sound, is designated as the "Andrew
"Red" Harris Spoil Island."
(2) The Department of Environmental Protection is directed
to erect suitable markers designating the "Andrew "Red" Harris
Spoil Island" as described in subsection (1).
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1219 -01-er